Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-1,122
Compliance checks; participation by minors; when.

In order to further the public policy of deterring minors from illegally obtaining or consuming alcoholic liquor, persons under twenty-one years of age may be authorized to assist duly authorized law enforcement officers to determine compliance with sections 53-180 and 53-180.02. Such compliance checks shall be conducted pursuant to guidelines adopted and promulgated by the Nebraska State Patrol with input from the commission. Unless a person is an emancipated minor at least eighteen years of age, no person under twenty-one years of age shall be authorized to participate or assist law enforcement officers in such compliance checks without the written consent of his or her parents or legal guardian.

Laws 2001, LB 114, § 7.